California, session 20252026, AB1868.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1255.4 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:1255.4. On or before January 1, 2030, the department shall update Section 70435(b)(2) paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 70435 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations to reflect current professional standards of care relating to extracorporeal bypass surgery.